Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB767.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 39A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Division of Emergency Management shall coordinate for the Governor all matters pertaining to the
comprehensive emergency management program and disaster and emergency response of the Commonwealth.
The division shall be the executive branch agency of state government having primary jurisdiction,
responsibility, and authority for the planning and execution of disaster and emergency assessment, mitigation,
preparedness, response, and recovery for the Commonwealth; the coordination of all disaster and emergency
response by and between all state agencies, all agencies of city, county, and urban-county or charter county
government, all local entities, and all political subdivisions of the Commonwealth for an emergency, declared
emergency, disaster, or catastrophe as contemplated in KRS 39A.010, 39A.020, or 39A.030; the coordination
of, and liaison with, related or concerned federal government agencies, elected officials of other states, private
organizations or private sector companies dealing with disaster and emergency response; the coordination of
all recovery operations and mitigation initiatives subsequent to disasters or emergencies; and the coordination
of all public information activities regarding state government disaster and emergency response operations.
(2) The Division of Emergency Management shall have and exercise the following powers, authorities, and duties:
(a) To develop, administer, and maintain a statewide comprehensive emergency management program for
the Commonwealth, and through it an integrated emergency management system for the disaster and
emergency response of the Commonwealth, which shall be coordinated with the emergency
management programs, and other related public safety, emergency response, mitigation, or disaster
recovery programs, of all appropriate federal government agencies including the Federal Emergency
Management Agency, the federal Department of Homeland Security, the State Department, the Federal
Aviation Administration, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the Department of
Transportation, the Environmental Protection Agency, the Occupational Safety and Health
Administration, the Department of Defense, the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, the
Department of Justice, the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms, the National Transportation
Safety Board, the Chemical Safety and Hazard Investigation Board, the Army Corps of Engineers, the
National Security Council, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Federal Railroad
Administration, the United States Geological Survey, the Department of Energy, the Nuclear
Regulatory Commission, the Department of Agriculture, the Department of Housing and Urban
Development, the American Red Cross, the other states, and other appropriate public or private
agencies, to the fullest appropriate extent;
(b) To coordinate the development, implementation, and maintenance of comprehensive emergency
management programs by local emergency management agencies in the cities, counties, and urban-
county or charter county governments of the Commonwealth to ensure that all such programs, agencies,
and organizations are organized, administered, and operated as functional components of the integrated
emergency management system of the Commonwealth;
(c) To develop and maintain a comprehensive, risk-based, all-hazards disaster and emergency response
plan entitled "Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan," the provisions of which shall establish the
organizational structure to be utilized by state government for managing disaster and emergency
response, and set forth the policies, procedures, and guidelines for the coordination and execution of all
disaster and emergency response for an emergency, declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophe in the
Commonwealth. The Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan shall be submitted to the Governor for
approval when the Governor assumes office following each gubernatorial election, or at other times as
the director deems appropriate. The Governor shall provide written approval of the Kentucky
Emergency Operations Plan through issuance of an executive order, and the division shall file a copy of
the executive order with the Legislative Research Commission. The Kentucky Emergency Operations
Plan shall be the primary strategic disaster and emergency response planning component of the
integrated emergency management system of the Commonwealth, and shall be utilized and followed by
all state agencies, all local government agencies, all local public agencies or entities, and all other
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
political subdivisions of the Commonwealth which may be involved in disaster and emergency response
in the Commonwealth. The Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan shall be updated by the division not
less than annually;
(d) To maintain and operate the State Emergency Operations Center facility, which shall be the official and
primary state government twenty-four (24) hour warning point, communications, and command center,
from which the Governor, cabinet secretaries, department heads, and other state agency officials can, at
any time, rapidly, adequately, and effectively manage the disaster and emergency response of the
Commonwealth. The State Emergency Operations Center facility shall be the primary state direction
and control component of the integrated emergency management system of the Commonwealth for the
coordination of all disaster and emergency response in the Commonwealth;
(e) To develop, monitor, and operate, on a twenty-four (24) hour per day basis, the appropriate alerting or
warning systems, public safety telecommunications systems, or radio networks; any state trunked, fiber,
or interactive communication systems; computer, fax, other telecommunications or information
networks; and systems needed for communication and coordination with all necessary or appropriate
federal, state, or local public safety, law enforcement, emergency management, or other disaster and
emergency response agencies, and state or local dispatch centers in the Commonwealth, and other
appropriate interests, and through these agencies and systems to receive or disseminate emergency
information, or to receive timely notification of, and continual assessment of, all threatened or actual
emergency incidents or disaster situations occurring anywhere in or near the Commonwealth;
(f) To immediately notify the Governor, the adjutant general, and the executive director of the Kentucky
Office of Homeland Security, or his or her designee, in the event of any major emergency incidents or
disaster occurrences, or the threatened or impending occurrence of any of these events, and to keep the
Governor, the adjutant general, and the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland
Security, or his or her designee, informed of all actions being taken in response to these events;
(g) To respond to the scenes of emergencies or disasters, or their threatened or impending occurrence and
to directly and immediately investigate, analyze, and assess the nature and seriousness of these
situations; to convene meetings, gather information, conduct briefings, and evaluate ongoing emergency
response activities; take actions to execute the appropriate provisions of the Kentucky Emergency
Operations Plan; coordinate the establishment and operation of a state incident management system;
establish or manage sub-state or area emergency operations centers, or on-scene command posts; and
fully expedite and coordinate the disaster and emergency response of the Commonwealth;
(h) To establish and operate area field offices of the division, each office to be headed by an area manager,
responsible for administering the policies, plans, programs, and duties of the division in specific
geographic areas of the Commonwealth, including the coordination of comprehensive emergency
management programs developed by the cities, counties, urban-county, or charter county governments
in the areas;
(i) To provide funds to the cities, counties, and urban-county or charter county governments of the
Commonwealth to support the development, administration, operation, and maintenance of local
emergency management agencies created pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;
(j) To require the regular submission of program administration data, records, materials, reports, or
documents from local emergency management agencies as may be necessary and sufficient to conduct
performance reviews and assessments to ensure compliance with all state or federal funding and
program requirements, and to ensure local program compatibility and consistency with the mission,
goals, and objectives of the comprehensive emergency management program and integrated emergency
management system of the Commonwealth;
(k) To ascertain the requirements of the Commonwealth and its cities and counties for emergency resources
and the necessities of life in the event of disaster or emergency; institute an emergency resource
management plan and procure emergency supplies, materials, and equipment; and use or employ in
time of emergency any of the property, services, and resources of state or local government in the
Commonwealth for the purposes set forth in KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;
(l) To institute public information and education programs, emergency management training programs, and
exercise programs to test and evaluate emergency operations plans and disaster and emergency response
and recovery capabilities;[ and]

CHAPTER 137 3
(m) To institute and maintain the Kentucky Qualification System, which shall be used to establish
qualification procedures, certification programs, and credentialing standards for professionals
involved in disaster and incident management, including incident management teams and emergency
operations centers; and
(n) To promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F.
Section 2. Whereas it is critical to the safety of the citizens of the Commonwealth to provide a process for
creating a deployable workforce of qualified, certified, and credentialed personnel to prepare for and respond to
natural disasters and emergencies of all types and sizes, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect
upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version